District of Columbia statutes.
10-204

Vacancies.

Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term by the agency which made the original selection.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 262, ch. 265, art. I, § 3
1981 Ed., § 8-204.
1973 Ed., § 8-204.